Ohio, session 136, SB51.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 4141.433 of the Revised Code be 5
enacted to read as follows: 6
Sec. 4141.433. (A) If the governor or the director of job 7
and family services enters into any agreement or issues a 8
special or standing order to implement a voluntary program 9
created on or after the effective date of this section under any 10
federal law providing for an increase in the weekly benefit 11
amount, duration of benefits, total benefits payable, or other 12
compensation, assistance, or allowances with respect to 13
unemployment, the general assembly may disapprove that agreement 14
or special or standing order, in whole or in part, by adopting a 15
concurrent resolution. 16
(B) On adoption of a concurrent resolution described in 17
division (A) of this section, the governor or the director shall 18

S. B. No. 51 Page 2
As Introduced
rescind the agreement or special or standing order as soon as 19
practicable. 20